Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-130 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created until December 1, 2026, the Federal


Education Deregulation Task Force to study and make recommendations



Req. No. 2623 Page 1


regarding federal education funding sources and state and local use


of federal funds.


B. The task force shall be comprised of seven (7) members as


follows:


1. Three members of the Senate including:


a. the chair of the Senate Education Committee or his or


her designee, and


b. two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of


the Senate;


2. Three members of the House of Representatives including:


a. the chair of the House Education Oversight Committee


or his or her designee, and


b. two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of


Representatives; and


3. One member appointed by the Governor, who shall be a


certified teacher.


C. Appointments to the task force shall be made within thirty


(30) days after the effective date of this act. The task force


shall conduct an organizational meeting no later than forty (40)


days after the effective date of this act. The task force may meet


as often as may be required to perform the duties imposed upon it.


D. The task force shall elect a chair, vice chair, and


secretary from among its members.



Req. No. 2623 Page 2


1. The chair shall preside over all meetings, assign aspects of


the task force’s work to members, and ensure timely compliance with


the provisions of this act.


2. The vice chair shall fulfill the duties of the chair in his


or her absence.


3. The secretary shall be responsible for notifying task force


members of the date, time, and location of task force meetings,


securing meeting space, keeping meeting attendance records, taking


minutes of task force meetings, and compiling and disseminating the


report required by subsection K of this section.


E. A quorum of the task force shall be required to approve any


final action of the task force. For purposes of this section, four


members shall constitute a quorum.


F. A member of the task force may be removed by a vote of five


members and replaced by a member appointed by a majority vote of the


task force.


G. The State Department of Education and the public school


districts in this state shall provide staff support for the task


force.


H. The task force shall investigate and identify:


1. a. all federal funding received by public school


districts in this state, specifying for each district


the amount of funds, the federal program under which



Req. No. 2623 Page 3


the funds were allocated, their prescribed use, and


any associated funding conditions or requirements,


b. all federal funding received by the State Department


of Education, specifying the amount of funds, the


federal program under which the funds were allocated,


their prescribed use, and any associated funding


conditions or requirements,


c. all funding received from the United States Department


of Education by any state or local agency or any


nonprofit organization, specifying for each agency or


organization the amount of funds, the federal program


under which the funds were allocated, their prescribed


use, and any associated funding conditions or


requirements, and


d. any and all federal statutory and regulatory


requirements, policies, interpretations, funding


conditions and requirements, directives, or guidance


from the United States Department of Education that is


applicable to this state.


2. The information identified pursuant to paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall include:


a. the name of the program or grant associated with any


maintenance of effort agreements, memorandum of


understanding agreements, contracts, or consent

Req. No. 2623 Page 4


decrees with any federal agency; any associated start


and completion dates; and corresponding System for


Award Management grant numbers,


b. identification of any federal, state, or local funds


used to implement multi-tiered systems of support as


required by federal law including third-party


partnerships, collaboration agreements, contracts, or


memorandum of understanding agreements, and


c. identification of any federal, state, or local funds


including Medicaid funding used to support health care


services, mental health services, assessments,


screenings, and child care services in or through


public school districts in this state.


I. For each identification made pursuant to subsection H of


this section, the task force shall consider the following:


1. Whether and to what extent the identified item has a


measurable, demonstrated, beneficial impact on the performance of


students, the high school graduation rate, student success in and


completion of postsecondary education, and long-term career success;


2. Whether the identified item prepares students for a high-


skill industry sector or occupation, a high-wage sector or


occupation, an in-demand industry sector or occupation, or other


careers eligible under federal workforce programs such as the



Req. No. 2623 Page 5


Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or the Carl D. Perkins


Career and Technical Education Improvement Act of 2006;


3. How the identified item complies with school district, state


or local agency, or State Department of Education strategic plans;


4. Any specific state statutory or judicial authorization


related to the identified item and any changes in existing state


policies or procedures that would be necessary if the identified


item were eliminated at the federal level;


5. Whether the identified item conflicts with any statutory or


administrative policies of this state;


6. The number of federally funded full- and part-time positions


necessary to carry out the identified item;


7. A description of all resources and obligations related to


the identified item;


8. Whether the identified item should be replaced at the state


level if it is eliminated at the federal level, taking into


consideration the costs and benefits of the identified item; and


9. Any recommended mechanisms for state-level replacement of


identified items at the federal level.


J. Members of the task force shall receive no compensation or


travel reimbursement.


K. The task force shall electronically submit a report of its


findings and recommendations by December 1, 2026, to the Governor,


the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the

Req. No. 2623 Page 6


House of Representatives. The report shall be posted on the


Legislature’s website in a manner and location that is easily


accessible to the public.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2623 EB 1/14/2026 5:27:13 PM





























Req. No. 2623 Page 7